Utah statutes.
75-5b-202.   Jurisdiction.
A court of this state has jurisdiction to appoint a guardian or issue a
protective order for a respondent if:
(1)  this state is the respondent's home state;
(2)  on the date the petition is filed, this state is a significant-connection
state and:
(a)  the respondent does not have a home state or a court of the respondent's
home state has declined to exercise jurisdiction because this state is a more
appropriate forum; or
(b)  the respondent has a home state, a petition for an appointment or order
is not pending in a court of that state or another significant-connection
state, and, before the court makes the appointment or issues the order:
(i)  a petition for an appointment or order is not filed in the respondent's
home state;
(ii)  an objection to the court's jurisdiction is not filed by a person
required to be notified of the proceeding; and
(iii)  the court in this state concludes that it is an appropriate forum under
the factors set forth in Section 75-5b-205;
(3)  this state does not have jurisdiction under either Subsection (1) or (2),
the respondent's home state and all significant-connection states have
declined to exercise jurisdiction because this state is the more appropriate
forum, and jurisdiction in this state is consistent with the constitutions of
this state and the United States; or
(4)  the requirements for special jurisdiction under Section 75-5b-204 are
met.
